Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
CHAPTER 258 Animal Control and Protection

258.005.
Definitions for KRS 258.005 to 258.087.

As used in KRS

258.005

to

258.087

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Dog” means any canine three (3) months of age or older for which there exists a United States Department of Agriculture approved rabies vaccine;

“Owner” means any person owning, keeping, or harboring a dog, cat, or ferret in Kentucky;

“Veterinarian” means a licensed practitioner of veterinary medicine;

“Qualified person” means a person granted a permit by the secretary for health and family services to vaccinate his own dog against rabies;

“Vaccination” means the administration by a veterinarian or other qualified person of rabies vaccine approved by and administered in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary for health and family services;

“Cat” means any feline three (3) months of age or older for which there exists a United States Department of Agriculture approved rabies vaccine;

“Animal control officer” means an individual who is employed or appointed by, or has contracted with:

A city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes relating to cruelty, mistreatment, sexual crimes against, or torture of animals, and local animal control ordinances; or

An entity that has contracted with a city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes relating to cruelty, mistreatment, sexual crimes against, or torture of animals, and local animal control ordinances;

“Ferret” means any musteline three (3) months of age or older for which there exists a United States Department of Agriculture approved rabies vaccine; and

“Quarantine” means the confinement of an animal for observation of clinical signs of illness indicating rabies infection, and the prevention of escape or contact with any person or other animal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 1, effective June 17, 1954; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1); 1978, ch. 37, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 426, § 514, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 568, effective June 20, 2005; 2019 ch. 184, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

258.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

258.015.
Dogs, cats, and ferrets to be vaccinated against rabies — Issuance and distribution of certificates — Tags for dogs — Requirements for compliance by qualified persons — Cat and ferret owners.

Every owner shall have his dog, cat, or ferret initially vaccinated against rabies by the age of four (4) months and revaccinated at the expiration of the immunization period as certified by the veterinarian. The veterinarian who vaccinates a dog, cat, or ferret shall issue to the owner a vaccination certificate on a form approved by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. The vaccination certificate shall be prepared and issued in duplicate, one (1) copy to be retained by the issuing veterinarian and one (1) copy to be given to the owner of the dog, cat, or ferret vaccinated. Each certificate shall bear the name and address of the veterinarian who issued it. The veterinarian shall also furnish each dog owner with a rabies tag bearing a serial number corresponding to the vaccination certificate with the year of immunization. The tag shall be affixed to a collar or harness furnished by the owner and shall be worn by the dog for which the tag was issued. No one except the owner or his duly authorized agent shall remove the tag.

Every qualified person who vaccinates his own dog shall comply with the vaccination certificate and tag requirement provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

Every owner of a cat or ferret shall show proof of a valid rabies vaccination upon request of an animal control officer or peace officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 2, effective June 17, 1954; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1); 1978, ch. 37, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 426, § 515, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 569, effective June 20, 2005; 2019 ch. 28, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since KRS

258.145

(now repealed) require[d] all dogs to carry a license tag and this section requires all dogs to carry a rabies vaccination identification tag, all dogs are required to wear two tags to be within state law.

OAG 79-186

.

The administration of rabies vaccines is the practice of veterinary medicine pursuant to KRS 321.181(5)(a). However, the Legislature in its power to regulate the health and safety of its citizens has authorized in this section and KRS 258.005(4) two limited exceptions granting certain individuals temporary permits to administer rabies shots to dogs.

OAG 92-155

.

Since the law requires that all dogs over four (4) months old be given a rabies vaccine administered by a veterinarian or a qualified person pursuant to this section and KRS

258.015

and after the initial rabies vaccine, a dog must be re-vaccinated at the expiration of the immunization period as certified by the veterinarian. A dog owner is not exempted by virtue of KRS 321.200(1)(b) from the requirement that the dog must have a current rabies vaccination administered by either a veterinarian or other qualified person.

OAG 92-155

.

258.020.
Commissioner to enforce law. [Repealed.]

258.025.
Secretary may exempt dogs from vaccination. [Repealed.]

258.030.
Owner may be summoned to produce dog in court; bond. [Repealed.]

258.035.
Dog, cat, or ferret vaccinated in other state need not be revaccinated.

Any owner who has had his dog, cat, or ferret vaccinated against rabies in another state by the proper authority shall not be required to have the dog, cat, or ferret revaccinated when brought into this state provided the requirements of the state under which the vaccination was made were of a standard not lower than those required in this state, and provided further that the dog wears a tag affixed to its collar or harness bearing the year of the vaccination and the owner of the cat or ferret shows proof of a valid rabies vaccination. One (1) year after the date of the vaccination, the dog, cat, or ferret shall be revaccinated unless provided otherwise by administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary for health and family services. The secretary for health and family services may promulgate administrative regulations governing the matter of reciprocity with other states.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 4, effective June 17, 1954; 1998, ch. 426, § 516, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 4, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 570, effective June 20, 2005.

258.040.
Proceedings against dog; dog may be ordered destroyed; county attorney’s fee; record. [Repealed.]

258.043.
Mass immunization clinics.

A local health department may sponsor mass rabies immunization clinics and shall contract with local veterinarians to administer the rabies vaccine. If the services of veterinarians are not available in the area, the local health department may contract with other veterinarians. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish a reasonable fee, not to exceed administrative costs of the program, to be charged to the owner of each dog, cat, or ferret to help defray the cost of the clinic.

No owner shall be required to have his dog, cat, or ferret vaccinated at a public clinic if he elects to have his dog, cat, or ferret vaccinated privately by a veterinarian of his choice.

No owner shall be required to have his dog vaccinated at a public clinic if he is a qualified person and elects to vaccinate his dog himself.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 37, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1994, ch. 260, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 517, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 5, effective July 13, 2004; 2018 ch. 136, § 18, effective July 1, 2019.

258.045.
Vaccination by veterinarians and other persons — Fees. [Repealed.]

258.050.
Appeal to circuit court; bond. [Repealed.]

258.055.
Quarantine in case of rabies epidemic — Emergency vaccinations.

If a local board of health has reason to believe or has been notified by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services that there is danger that rabies may spread within the county, the board shall publish a notice requiring owners of specified animals in the affected area of the county to confine the animals for any periods that may be necessary to prevent the spread of rabies. If it is deemed advisable in the interest of public health, the local board of health shall order all specified animals in the affected area to be vaccinated against rabies, except animals that have been vaccinated within the past six (6) months under the provisions of KRS

258.005

to

258.087

. If the local board fails or neglects to order a vaccination, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall do so. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services may aid the local health department in the execution of any emergency vaccinations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 6, effective June 17, 1954; 1998, ch. 426, § 518, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 571, effective June 20, 2005.

258.060.
Commonwealth’s and county attorney to prosecute case upon appeal. [Repealed.]

258.065.
Physicians to report persons bitten by dogs, cats, ferrets, and other animals — Reporting when local health department is closed.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, every physician shall, within twelve (12) hours after his first professional attendance of a person bitten by a dog, cat, ferret, or other animal, report to the local health department the name, age, sex, and precise location of the person so bitten. If a child is bitten and no physician attends, the report shall be made by his parents or guardian. If an adult is bitten and no physician attends, he or the person caring for him shall make the report.

If the local health department is closed when a physician, parent, guardian, or other adult attends to a bitten person, the physician, parent, guardian, or other adult shall report the incident on the next working day of the health department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 7, effective June 17, 1954; 2004, ch. 189, § 7, effective July 13, 2004.

258.070.
Mad dog to be ordered killed; fee; concealment prohibited. [Repealed.]

258.075.
Secretary for health services to administer rabies law.

The secretary for health and family services may administer the provisions of KRS

258.005

to

258.087

through the local health departments and may promulgate any administrative regulations and employ such personnel as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of KRS

258.005

to

258.087

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 8, effective June 17, 1954; 1998, ch. 426, § 519, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 8, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 572, effective June 20, 2005.

258.080.
Dogs that may be killed by any person. [Repealed.]

258.085.
Quarantine of animals suspected of having rabies — Destruction of animal in lieu of quarantine — Exceptions — Head of animal suspected of being rabid to be sent to laboratory.

A health officer or his agent shall have the authority to quarantine for a period not to exceed:

One hundred eighty (180) days any animal bitten by another animal known or suspected to have rabies;

Ten (10) days any dog, cat, or ferret which has bitten a human being; or

Ten (10) days any dog, cat, or ferret which exhibits symptoms of rabies.

In lieu of the quarantines provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a health officer or his agent may order an animal to be destroyed and tested for rabies.

If a wild or exotic animal bites a human being or exhibits symptoms of rabies, that animal shall be destroyed and tested for rabies.

Service animals, as defined in KRS

525.010

, and service animals in training, that are vaccinated in accordance with KRS

258.015

, are under the control of a law enforcement agency, and are acting in the line of duty, shall be exempt from the quarantine described in paragraph (a)2. of this subsection.

If an animal dies with rabies, is suspected of having died with rabies, or is destroyed because of having been suspected of being rabid, the owner, if known, whether the animal had been previously quarantined or not, shall send the head of the animal to a laboratory approved by the secretary for health and family services to be tested for rabies.

The owner of any animal quarantined or tested under this section shall be liable for any expenses incurred as a result of the quarantine or testing.

Any owner who destroys or disposes of an animal that has bitten a human being shall be liable for any rabies postexposure treatment if the animal is destroyed or disposed of in a manner that does not allow for rabies testing or quarantine.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 9, effective June 17, 1954; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1); 1978, ch. 37, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 426, § 520, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 9, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 573, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 52, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Kentucky law does not impose a general requirement upon either a local health department or a city for the payment of the expense of housing animals that have bitten people.

OAG 68-387

.

258.087.
Authorization to provide for more stringent regulation of rabies control.

Any city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government may, by the adoption of an appropriate ordinance or resolution, provide for more stringent regulation of rabies control in dogs, cats, ferrets, and other animals than set forth in KRS

258.005

to

258.087

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 37, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 189, § 10, effective July 13, 2004.

258.090.
Poisoning dog prohibited — City ordinances not affected. [Repealed.]

258.095.
Definitions for KRS 258.095 to 258.500.

As used in KRS

258.095

to

258.500

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Board” means the Animal Control Advisory Board created by KRS

258.117

;

“Dog” means any domestic canine, six (6) months of age or older;

“Owner,” when applied to the proprietorship of a dog, includes:

Every person having a right of property in the dog; and

Every person who:

Keeps or harbors the dog;

Has the dog in his or her care;

Permits the dog to remain on or about premises owned and occupied by him or her; or

Permits the dog to remain on or about premises leased and occupied by him or her;

“Attack” means a dog’s attempt to bite or successful bite of a human being. This definition shall not apply to a dog’s attack of a person who has illegally entered or is trespassing on the dog owner’s property in violation of KRS

511.060

,

511.070

,

511.080

, or

511.090

;

“Vicious dog” means any individual dog declared by a court to be a vicious dog;

“Animal control officer” means an individual who is employed or appointed by, or has contracted with:

A city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes relating to cruelty, mistreatment, sexual crimes against, or torture of animals, and local animal control ordinances; or

An entity that has contracted with a city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes relating to cruelty, mistreatment, sexual crimes against, or torture of animals, and local animal control ordinances;

“Designated license facility” means any person, facility, or business designated by resolution of the governing body of the county to collect license fees under KRS

258.135

;

“Cat” means any domestic feline three (3) months of age or older;

“Ferret” means any domestic musteline three (3) months of age or older;

“Euthanasia” means the act of putting an animal to death in a humane manner by methods specified as acceptable for that species by the most recent report of the American Veterinary Medical Association Panel on Euthanasia, subject to the requirements provided by KRS

258.505

;

“Animal shelter” means any facility used to house or contain animals, operated or maintained by a governmental body, incorporated humane society, animal welfare society, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or other nonprofit organization;

“Quarantine” means the confinement of an animal for observation of clinical signs of illness indicating rabies infection, and the prevention of escape or contact with any person or other animal;

“Livestock” means poultry; ratites; and cervine, bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, or equine animals that are privately owned and raised in a confined area for breeding stock, food, fiber, or other products; and

“Poultry” means chickens, ducks, turkeys, or other domestic fowl.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 12, effective June 17, 1954; 1998, ch. 440, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 179, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 189, § 11, effective July 13, 2004; 2017 ch. 30, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 184, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

258.100.
Owner may recover if his dog is illegally killed. [Repealed.]

258.105.
Enforcement by Commissioner of Agriculture — Employment and powers of personnel. [Repealed.]

258.110.
Female dog not to be at large when in heat. [Repealed.]

258.115.
Advisory committee. [Repealed.]

258.117.
Animal Control Advisory Board — Purpose — Promulgation of administrative regulations — Membership.

The Animal Control Advisory Board is hereby created for the purposes of evaluating applications for and reviewing disbursements from the animal control and care fund, creating training programs, and other duties relating to animal control and care in the counties of the Commonwealth. The Animal Control Advisory Board shall promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.

The advisory board shall be attached to the Kentucky Department of Agriculture for administrative purposes.

The advisory board shall be composed of the following members appointed by the Governor as specified:

Two (2) members selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Animal Control Association;

Two (2) members selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Veterinary Medical Association;

Two (2) members selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Farm Bureau;

Two (2) members selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Association of Counties;

Two (2) members selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky Houndsmen Association; and

Two (2) members selected from a list of three (3) submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities.

Appointed members shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment for the unexpired portion of the term.

Members of the advisory board shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day for attendance at meetings and shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred for travel. No per diem or travel expenses shall be paid except for meetings of the full advisory board.

The advisory board shall elect one (1) of its members to serve as chair for a term of two (2) years.

The advisory board shall meet quarterly or upon the call of the chair.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 608, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 12, effective July 13, 2004.

258.119.
Animal control and care fund — Distribution of moneys — Eligibility requirements.

The “Animal Control and Care Fund” is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury. The fund may also receive gifts, grants from public and private sources, state appropriations, and federal funds. Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in this fund shall be invested as provided for in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be credited to the fund. Any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year, and moneys in this fund shall be continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this section.

Moneys from the fund shall be used by the Animal Control Advisory Board for board expenses, for the creation and support of statewide programs related to animal control and care, and for training animal control officers. “Statewide programs” includes, but is not limited to, the reimbursement of costs for preexposure rabies vaccinations for all animal control and care workers. When determining the distribution of the moneys relating to training, the need of the applicant shall be one (1) of the criteria considered by the board. Based on recommendations of the Animal Control Advisory Board, any moneys not expended under this subsection may be distributed annually as grants to counties with an established animal control and care program meeting the requirements of subsection (3) of this section or approved plan to establish an animal control and care program under subsection (4) of this section.

As used in this section, “animal control and care program” means a program in which the county:

Employs, appoints, or contracts with an animal control officer, or contracts with an entity that employs, appoints, or contracts with an animal control officer, as required by KRS

258.195

, who is a high school graduate and has completed the training requirements set forth by the Animal Control Advisory Board; and

Maintains an animal shelter, enters into an intergovernmental agreement for the establishment of a regional animal shelter, or contracts with an entity authorized to maintain sheltering and animal control services, to provide services that:

Segregate male and female animals by species in runs and holding areas;

Provide separate runs or holding areas for ill or injured animals. An ill or injured animal shall be treated with proper veterinary care or euthanized;

Provide quarantine for dogs and cats presented to the shelter when quarantine by the owner is not feasible or desirable, the cost of quarantine to be borne by the animal owner at the shelter’s regular housing costs and fees. Quarantined dogs and cats shall be held in isolation for observation of symptoms of rabies for a period of ten (10) days from the date the dog or cat bit a person. If the dog or cat dies or is euthanized while in quarantine, it shall be submitted to the local health department for testing for the presence of the rabies virus. The cost of the testing shall be borne by the animal owner or the local health department may bear the cost at its discretion;

Provide holding areas with protection from the weather, including heated quarters during cold weather. Holding areas shall be free of debris or standing water; shall provide adequate lighting, ventilation, and sanitary conditions to promote a safe, healthy environment; and shall provide adequate space to allow for normal movement, including standing to full height, sitting, turning, and lying down in a natural position without coming in contact with the top or sides of the enclosure or another animal;

Provide runs and cages built of materials which can be readily cleaned and disinfected, including floors made of an impervious material;

Provide access to the public for no less than twenty-four (24) hours in one (1) week, with the hours that the facility is open to the public posted in a visible location;

Employ euthanasia methods specified as acceptable for that species by the most recent report of the American Veterinary Medical Association Panel on Euthanasia;

Provide potable, uncontaminated water to every animal at all times, and palatable, uncontaminated food daily; and

Maintain a record on each animal impounded. Records shall be maintained for a period of two (2) years and shall include:

Date impounded;

Location found or picked up;

Sex of animal and spay or neuter status, if known;

Breed or description, and color; and

Date reclaimed, adopted, or euthanized.

Counties submitting plans proposing to establish an animal control and care program for approval by the Animal Control Advisory Board shall comply with the requirements of:

Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section within twelve (12) months of the date the documentation is submitted; and

Paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section within twenty-four (24) months of the date the documentation is submitted.

To be eligible for any moneys distributed as grants to counties under subsection (2) of this section, counties shall submit an application to the commissioner, on a form prescribed by the Department of Agriculture, by July 15 of each year. Moneys shall be used for construction, equipment, educational supplies, and other uses or programs approved by the advisory board, but shall not be used to increase wages of animal control officers or other personnel. Counties receiving money from the Department of Agriculture shall comply with the terms of the plan or program. If the terms of the plan or program are not complied with, the county shall refund the money to the Department of Agriculture.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 608, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 179, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 189, § 13, effective July 13, 2004.

258.120.
Sheriff to impound dogs, when; seizure of unlicensed dogs. [Repealed.]

258.121.
Animal shelter trust fund — Allocation of moneys. [Repealed.]

258.125.
Livestock fund created — Expenditures — Reversion of excess. [Repealed.]

258.130.
Impounded dog to be sold or destroyed; disposition of sale moneys. [Repealed.]

258.135.
Establishment of dog licensing program by county or city ordinance.

The governing body of each county may establish an animal licensing program by ordinance. It shall be the responsibility of each county to administer and enforce its licensing program.

In addition to the licensing program provided in subsection (1) of this section, any city may establish an animal licensing program by ordinance. It shall be the responsibility of the city to administer and enforce its licensing program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 16, effective June 17, 1954; 1990, ch. 385, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 163, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 440, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 179, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 189, § 14, effective July 13, 2004.

258.140.
Fees for keeping and impounding dogs. [Repealed.]

258.145.
Licenses and tags — Tattooing of dogs — Tag to be affixed to collar — Burden of proof of license. [Repealed.]

258.150.
Keeping unlicensed dog prohibited. [Repealed.]

258.155.
License for part of year. [Repealed.]

258.160.
Dogs temporarily in state need not be licensed. [Repealed.]

258.165.
Kennel licenses and tags. [Repealed.]

258.170.
Dog licenses; application; fees. [Repealed.]

258.175.
Dogs to be kept in kennel. [Repealed.]

258.180.
Form and duration of license. [Repealed.]

258.185.
Records of dog and kennel licenses. [Repealed.]

258.190.
Form of tag. [Repealed.]

258.195.
Employment, appointment, or contract with animal control officers — Establishment and maintenance of animal shelters — Intergovernmental agreements — Authority of animal control officers.

The governing body of each county shall employ, appoint, or contract with an animal control officer, or shall contract with an entity that employs, appoints, or contracts with an animal control officer, and shall establish and maintain an animal shelter as a means of facilitating and administering KRS

258.095

to

258.500

. One (1) or more counties may enter into intergovernmental agreements for the establishment of regional animal shelters, or may contract with entities authorized to maintain sheltering and animal control services. Animal shelters shall meet the standards provided by KRS 258.119(3)(b) within three (3) years after July 13, 2004. Governing bodies may adopt additional standards and ordinances related to public health, safety, enforcement, and the efficient and appropriate operation of their shelters and their animal control programs.

Cities may employ, appoint, or contract with animal control officers, or may contract with an entity that employs, appoints, or contracts with animal control officers, for the enforcement of this chapter and local animal control ordinances within their corporate limits. Cities may enter into agreements with the counties for the enforcement of the county’s animal control ordinances. The agreement shall include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, setting out the jurisdiction and the duties of the animal control officer respective to the agreement.

Animal control officers shall have the authority to issue uniform citations, local citations, or local notices for the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes relating to cruelty, mistreatment, or torture of animals, and animal control ordinances in their respective jurisdictions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 22, effective June 17, 1954; 1998, ch. 440, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 15, effective July 13, 2004.

258.200.
Tag to be kept on dog; dog without tag prima facie unlicensed. [Repealed.]

258.205.
Dog temporarily in state need not be licensed — Burden of proof. [Repealed.]

258.210.
Removal of tag prohibited. [Repealed.]

258.212.
Tampering with or removal of domesticated animal’s identification prohibited — Exceptions — Penalty.

No person other than the owner shall tamper with or remove without permission an identification tag, chip, locator, or electronic tracking device from a domesticated animal of any age, including but not limited to a hound or dog used in the sport of hunting.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a person removing an identification tag, chip, locator, or electronic tracking device if the removal is:

Necessary to prevent or treat an injury to the animal;

Done by a law enforcement officer or animal control officer for a legitimate purpose; or

Done with the written permission of the owner of the animal.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 21, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

Sentence of imprisonment for misdemeanor, see KRS

532.090

.

258.215.
Seizure, impounding, and destruction of dog lacking rabies tag or other identification — Holding period before destruction — Notice to owner — Reclamation of dog, cat, or ferret — Fees — Quarantine — Exemption of hunting dog.

Peace officers or animal control officers shall seize and impound any dog which does not bear a valid rabies tag or other legible identification which is found running at large. Any dog which an officer or animal control officer seizes shall be impounded in the designated animal shelter of the county and confined in a humane manner. If, after a reasonable effort, the seizure of an unrestrained dog cannot be made, or the dog presents a hazard to public safety or property or has an injury or physical condition which causes the dog to suffer, the animal control officer or peace officer may immediately destroy the dog by the most reasonable and humane means then available.

Impounded dogs shall be kept for not less than five (5) days, unless reclaimed by their owners. Dogs not reclaimed and those not placed in suitable new homes may be humanely euthanized after the five (5) day holding period, unless the dog has an injury or physical condition which causes it to suffer. In those cases the animal shelter may immediately euthanize the dog, and if a human being has been bitten by the dog, the dog shall be tested for rabies.

If an owner is identified, the impounding agency shall immediately notify the owner of the impoundment by the most expedient means available.

Any animal shelter, public or private, which takes in stray animals and does not have regular hours for public access, shall post semimonthly either in a local newspaper or the newspaper with the highest circulation in the county, the shelter location, hours of operation, the period that impounded animals shall be held, and a contact number.

Upon reclaiming an impounded dog, cat, or ferret, the owner shall show proof of a valid rabies vaccination. If proof of the vaccination cannot be provided, the owner shall purchase a vaccination voucher from the animal shelter. The voucher shall be valid for ten (10) days from the date of issuance and shall be used in the prescribed time period. The animal shelter shall reimburse the veterinarian for the amount of the voucher upon presentation to the shelter by the administering veterinarian.

The owner of an impounded animal is responsible for all fees associated with the impoundment of the animal. If the owner can be identified, the fees are due even if the owner does not reclaim the animal.

Dogs, cats, or ferrets which have bitten a person shall be maintained in quarantine by the owner for ten (10) days from the date of the bite. Owners who fail to properly quarantine their animals shall be subject to a citation for violation of this subsection and the dog, cat, or ferret shall be removed to the animal shelter for the remainder of the quarantine period. The owner shall be responsible for all associated fees of the quarantine and impoundment.

A hound or other hunting dog which has been released from confinement for hunting purposes shall be deemed to be under reasonable control of its owner or handler while engaged in or returning from hunting, and, if a hunting dog becomes temporarily lost from a pack or wanders from actual control or sight of its owner or handler, the owner or handler shall not be deemed to be in violation of the provisions of this section as a result of the dog’s having become temporarily lost or having wandered from immediate control or sight of the owner or handler.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 24, effective June 17, 1954; 1998, ch. 440, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 179, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 189, § 16, effective July 13, 2004.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A city ordinance providing that any dog without a proper license tag or other legible identification and which is found running at large may be seized by a peace officer is valid under this section, but such ordinance should also contain a provision, in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, requiring that unlicensed dogs that are picked up be impounded for seven days before they are destroyed.

OAG 73-105

.

“Destruction of a dog in a humane manner” would include shooting which would not constitute cruelty as long as death was instantaneous.

OAG 73-105

.

Although only those dogs six months of age or older are required to be licensed, any dog which does not bear either a proper license tag or other legible identification may be seized and impounded by a peace officer if it is found to be running at large.

OAG 76-149

.

Contrary to the clause in this section about “sold in accordance with other provisions of this chapter,” there are no provisions in KRS Chapter 258 relative to the selling of dogs which have been held for the seven-day period and not claimed.

OAG 82-595

.

While there are no express statutory provisions requiring the dog warden to pick up dogs anywhere in the county, the fiscal court pursuant to its regulatory powers under KRS

258.195

may require the dog warden to pick up unlicensed or unidentified dogs found running at large.

OAG 83-209

.

While an unlicensed dog loose and unattended on the public way is clearly running at large and subject to being picked up by a peace officer or a dog warden (when he has been so instructed by his employing governmental entity), the status of a dog which is loose and unattended on the private property of someone other than his owner is not clear.

OAG 83-209

.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Validity of statute or ordinance providing for destruction of dogs, 56 A.L.R.2d 1024.

Personal liability of public officer for killing or injuring animal while carrying out statutory duties with respect to it, 2 A.L.R.3d 822.

Construction and application of ordinances relating to unrestrained dogs, cats, or other domesticated animals, 1 A.L.R.4th 994.

Construction of provisions of statute or ordinance governing occasion, time, or manner of summary destruction of domestic animals by public authorities, 42 A.L.R.4th 839.

Action in Replevin for Recovery of Dog or Cat, 85 A.L.R.6th 429.

258.220.
Replacement of tag. [Repealed.]

258.225.
Peace officers and animal control officers required to perform duties — Interference prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any peace officer or animal control officer to refuse to perform his duties under the provisions of this chapter.

It shall be unlawful for any person to interfere with any peace officer, animal control officer, or agent in the enforcement of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 119, § 25, effective June 17, 1954; 1998, ch. 440, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 189, § 17, effective July 13, 2004.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Not only does a county dog warden have responsibilities under the state dog law but so does the city marshal, as he is a peace officer and is required to enforce the provisions of the state dog law, and this duty exists whether or not the city has a valid dog control ordinance.

OAG 80-330

.

Other than the requirements imposed upon peace officers, cities are not required to enforce the provisions of KRS Chapter 258.

OAG 82-447

.

258.230.
Deputy sheriff may issue licenses; to make report and accounting. [Repealed.]